nb: Beltespennetype: Automatisk/skrallespenne; Boksspenne; Klemmespenne; Klipsspenne; D-ringspenne; Dobbel stiftspenne; Dobbel ringspenne; Rammespenne; Selespenne; Utskiftbar spenne; Magnetisk spenne; Mikrojusterbar spenne; O-ringspenne; Platespenne; Hurtigspenne; Vendbar spenne; Enkel stiftspenne; Skyve-/stiftløs spenne; Klikkspenne; Annet
pl: Typ klamry paska: Klamra automatyczna (zapadkowa); Klamra typu box; Klamra zaciskowa; Klamra na klips; Klamra D-ring; Klamra z podwójnym bolcem; Klamra z dwoma kółkami; Klamra ramowa; Klamra uprzężowa; Klamra wymienna; Klamra magnetyczna; Klamra z mikroregulacją; Klamra w kształcie litery O (O-ring); Klamra płytkowa (pełna); Klamra szybkozłączka; Klamra dwustronna; Klamra z pojedynczym bolcem (tradycyjna); Klamra suwakowa (bezbolcowa); Klamra zatrzaskowa; Inne
pt-PT: Tipo de fivela de cinto: Fivela automática / de roquete; Fivela em caixa; Fivela de pinça; Fivela de mola; Fivela em D; Fivela de pino duplo; Fivela de argola dupla; Fivela de estrutura; Fivela de arnês; Fivela intercambiável; Fivela magnética; Fivela microajustável; Fivela em O; Fivela em placa; Fivela de libertação rápida; Fivela reversível; Fivela de pino simples; Fivela deslizante / sem pino; Fivela de engate; Outro
el: Τύπος αγκράφας ζώνης: Αυτόματη / με καστάνια; Αγκράφα κουτί; Αγκράφα κλιπ; Αγκράφα με κλιπ; Αγκράφα D-ring; Αγκράφα με διπλή ακίδα; Αγκράφα με διπλό κρίκο; Αγκράφα με πλαίσιο; Αγκράφα ιμάντα; Εναλλάξιμη αγκράφα; Μαγνητική αγκράφα; Αγκράφα μικρορύθμισης; Αγκράφα O-ring; Αγκράφα πλακέτα; Αγκράφα ταχείας απελευθέρωσης; Αγκράφα δύο όψεων; Αγκράφα με μονή ακίδα / καρφίτσα; Συρόμενη / χωρίς ακίδα; Αγκράφα ασφαλείας (snap); Άλλο
fr: Type de boucle de ceinture: Boucle automatique / à cliquet; Boucle pleine; Boucle à pince; Boucle à clip; Boucle en D; Boucle à double ardillon; Boucle à double anneau; Boucle à cadre; Boucle de harnais; Boucle interchangeable; Boucle magnétique; Boucle à micro-ajustement; Boucle en O; Boucle à plaque; Boucle à dégagement rapide; Boucle réversible; Boucle à simple ardillon / goupille; Boucle à glissière / sans ardillon; Boucle à bouton-pression; Autre
hu: Övcsat típusa: Automata / racsnis csat; Dobozcsat; Szorítócsat; Gyorscsat; D-gyűrűs csat; Duplatüskés csat; Duplagyűrűs csat; Keretes csat; Hámcsat; Cserélhető csat; Mágneses csat; Finombeállítós csat; O-gyűrűs csat; Lemezcsat; Gyorskioldó csat; Kifordítható csat; Szimplatüskés / tűs csat; Csúszócsat; Bepattanó csat; Egyéb
vi: Loại khóa thắt lưng: Khóa tự động / Khóa trượt; Khóa hộp; Khóa kẹp; Khóa cài; Khóa chữ D; Khóa hai kim; Khóa vòng đôi; Khóa dạng khung; Khóa dầm; Khóa tháo rời; Khóa từ tính; Khóa vi chỉnh; Khóa chữ O; Khóa mặt kim loại; Khóa tháo nhanh; Khóa xoay hai mặt; Khóa một kim / khóa xỏ; Khóa trượt / Khóa không kim; Khóa bấm; Khác
ko: 벨트 버클 유형: 자동/래칫 버클; 박스 버클; 클램프 버클; 클립 버클; D링 버클; 더블 프롱 버클; 더블 링 버클; 프레임 버클; 하네스 버클; 교체형 버클; 마그네틱 버클; 미세 조절 버클; O링 버클; 플레이트 버클; 퀵 릴리스 버클; 양면 버클; 싱글 프롱/핀 버클; 슬라이드/프롱리스 버클; 스냅 버클; 기타
lt-LT: Diržo sagties tipas: Automatinė / reketinė sagtis; Dėžutės formos sagtis; Užspaudžiama sagtis; Sagtis su segtuku; D formos žiedų sagtis; Dvigubų dantukų sagtis; Dvigubo žiedo sagtis; Rėminė sagtis; Pakinktų stiliaus sagtis; Keičiama sagtis; Magnetinė sagtis; Tikslaus reguliavimo sagtis; O formos žiedų sagtis; Plokštelinė sagtis; Greito atsegimo sagtis; Dvipusė sagtis; Vieno dantuko / kištukinė sagtis; Slankiojanti / bedantė sagtis; Fiksatoriaus sagtis; Kita
tr: Kemer tokası tipi: Otomatik / cırcırlı toka; Kutu toka; Sıkıştırmalı toka; Klipsli toka; D halka toka; Çift dilli toka; Çift halka toka; Çerçeveli toka; Koşum tokası; Değiştirilebilir toka; Manyetik toka; Mikro ayarlı toka; O halka toka; Plaka toka; Hızlı açılan toka; Çift taraflı toka; Tek dilli / pimli toka; Sürgülü / dilsiz toka; Geçmeli toka; Diğer
it: Tipo di fibbia della cintura: Fibbia automatica / a cricchetto; Fibbia a scatola; Fibbia a morsetto; Fibbia a clip; Fibbia ad anello a D; Fibbia a doppio ardiglione; Fibbia a doppio anello; Fibbia a cornice; Fibbia a imbracatura; Fibbia intercambiabile; Fibbia magnetica; Fibbia con microregolazione; Fibbia ad anello a O; Fibbia a piastra; Fibbia a sgancio rapido; Fibbia reversibile; Fibbia a singolo ardiglione / a perno; Fibbia a scorrimento / senza ardiglione; Fibbia a scatto; Altro
fi: Vyönsoljen tyyppi: Automaattinen solki / räikkäsolki; Laatikkosolki; Puristussolki; Klipsikiinnitys; D-rengassolki; Kaksipiikkinen solki; Kaksoisrengassolki; Kehyssolki; Valjassolki; Vaihdettava solki; Magneettisolki; Mikrosäädettävä solki; O-rengassolki; Levysolki; Pikalukkosolki; Käännettävä solki; Yksipiikkinen solki; Liukusolki / piikitön solki; Pistosolki; Muu
bg-BG: Тип катарама за колан: Автоматична / тресчотъчна катарама; Катарама тип кутия; Катарама със щипка; Катарама с клипс; D-образна катарама; Катарама с два езика; Катарама с два пръстена; Рамкова катарама; Катарама за сбруя; Сменяема катарама; Магнитна катарама; Катарама с микрорегулиране; О-образна катарама; Катарама тип плочка; Катарама за бързо освобождаване; Катарама с две лица; Катарама с един език / щифт; Плъзгаща се / катарама без език; Катарама с щракване; Друго
da: Bæltespændetype: Automatisk / skraldespænde; Kassespænde; Klemmespænde; Clipsspænde; D-ringsspænde; Dobbelt dornspænde; Dobbelt ringspænde; Rammespænde; Selespænde; Udskifteligt spænde; Magnetisk spænde; Mikrojusterbart spænde; O-ringsspænde; Pladespænde; Quick-release-spænde; Vendbart spænde; Enkelt dornspænde / pindespænde; Glidespænde / dornløst spænde; Klikspænde; Andet
es: Tipo de hebilla del cinturón: Hebilla automática/de trinquete; Hebilla de caja; Hebilla de abrazadera; Hebilla de clip; Hebilla de anilla en D; Hebilla de doble púa; Hebilla de doble anilla; Hebilla de marco; Hebilla de arnés; Hebilla intercambiable; Hebilla magnética; Hebilla de microajuste; Hebilla de anilla en O; Hebilla de placa; Hebilla de liberación rápida; Hebilla reversible; Hebilla de púa/clavija simple; Hebilla deslizante/sin púa; Hebilla a presión; Otro
th: หัวเข็มขัดประเภทต่างๆ: หัวเข็มขัดอัตโนมัติ/แบบเฟือง; หัวเข็มขัดแบบกล่อง; หัวเข็มขัดแบบหนีบ; หัวเข็มขัดแบบคลิป; หัวเข็มขัดห่วงรูปตัว D; หัวเข็มขัดแบบเข็มคู่; หัวเข็มขัดแบบห่วงคู่; หัวเข็มขัดแบบกรอบ; หัวเข็มขัดแบบสายรัด; หัวเข็มขัดแบบถอดเปลี่ยนได้; หัวเข็มขัดแม่เหล็ก; หัวเข็มขัดปรับละเอียด; หัวเข็มขัดห่วงรูปตัว O; หัวเข็มขัดแบบแผ่น; หัวเข็มขัดแบบปลดเร็ว; หัวเข็มขัดแบบสลับด้านได้; หัวเข็มขัดแบบเข็มเดี่ยว/แบบหมุด; หัวเข็มขัดแบบเลื่อน/ไม่มีเข็ม; หัวเข็มขัดแบบแป๊ก; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 皮帶扣類型: 自動/棘輪扣環; 盒式扣環; 夾式扣環; 夾扣; D 型環扣; 雙針扣; 雙環扣; 框架扣環; 馬具扣環; 可替換扣環; 磁吸扣環; 微調扣環; O 型環扣; 板式扣環; 快拆扣環; 雙面扣環; 單針扣; 滑動/無針扣; 彈簧扣環; 其他
sv: Bältesspännetyp: Automatiskt spänne/klickspänne; Boxspänne; Klämspänne; Klickspänne; D-ringsspänne; Spänne med dubbla piggar; Dubbelt ringspänne; Ramspänne; Selspänne; Utbytbart spänne; Magnetspänne; Spänne med mikrojustering; O-ringsspänne; Plattspänne; Snabbspänne; Vändbart spänne; Spänne med enkel pigg; Glidspänne/spänne utan pigg; Snäppspänne; Övrigt
hr-HR: Tip kopče remena: Automatska / remenska kopča; Kutijasta kopča; Stezna kopča; Kopča s klipsom; Kopča s D-prstenom; Kopča s dva jezička; Kopča s dva prstena; Okvirna kopča; Kopča za uprtač; Izmjenjiva kopča; Magnetska kopča; Kopča s mikroprilagodbom; Kopča s O-prstenom; Pločasta kopča; Kopča za brzo otpuštanje; Dvostrana kopča; Kopča s jednim jezičkom; Klizna / kopča bez jezička; Pritisna kopča; Ostalo
ru: Тип пряжки ремня: Автоматическая пряжка / Пряжка с храповым механизмом; Пряжка-коробочка; Пряжка-зажим; Пряжка-клипса; Пряжка с D-образным кольцом; Пряжка с двумя язычками; Пряжка с двумя кольцами; Рамочная пряжка; Упряжная пряжка; Сменная пряжка; Магнитная пряжка; Пряжка с микрорегулировкой; Пряжка с О-образным кольцом; Пряжка-бляха; Быстроразъемная пряжка; Двусторонняя пряжка; Пряжка с одним язычком (классическая); Скользящая пряжка (без язычка); Пряжка-защелка; Другое
nl: Riemgesp type: Automatische / ratelgesp; Kastgesp; Klemgesp; Clipgesp; D-ringgesp; Gesp met dubbele doorn; Dubbele ringgesp; Framegesp; Harnasgesp; Verwisselbare gesp; Magnetische gesp; Micro-verstelbare gesp; O-ringgesp; Plaatgesp; Quick release-gesp; Omkeerbare gesp; Gesp met enkele doorn / pin; Schuifgesp / gesp zonder doorn; Klikgesp; Overige
en: Belt buckle type: Automatic / ratchet buckle; Box buckle; Clamp buckle; Clip buckle; D-ring buckle; Double prong buckle; Double ring buckle; Frame buckle; Harness buckle; Interchangeable buckle; Magnetic buckle; Micro-adjust buckle; O-ring buckle; Plate buckle; Quick release buckle; Reversible buckle; Single prong / pin buckle; Slide / prongless buckle; Snap buckle; Other
ro-RO: Tipul cataramei curelei: Cataramă automată / cu clichet; Cataramă casetă; Cataramă cu clemă; Cataramă cu clips; Cataramă tip D-ring (inel D); Cataramă cu două limbi; Cataramă cu două inele; Cataramă cu cadru; Cataramă tip ham; Cataramă interschimbabilă; Cataramă magnetică; Cataramă cu micro-reglare; Cataramă tip O-ring (inel O); Cataramă cu placă; Cataramă cu deschidere rapidă; Cataramă reversibilă; Cataramă cu o singură limbă; Cataramă glisantă / fără limbă; Cataramă cu capse; Altele
sk-SK: Typ remeňovej pracky: Automatická / račňová pracka; Krabicová pracka; Zverná pracka; Zaklapávacia pracka; Pracka s D-krúžkom; Dvojtŕňová pracka; Pracka s dvoma krúžkami; Rámová pracka; Postrojová pracka; Vymeniteľná pracka; Magnetická pracka; Pracka s mikroúpravou; Pracka s O-krúžkom; Doštičková pracka; Rýchloupínacia pracka; Obojstranná pracka; Jednotŕňová / jazýčková pracka; Posuvná / beztŕňová pracka; Zacvakávacia pracka; Iné
zh-CN: 皮带扣类型: 自动/棘轮扣; 盒形扣; 夹扣; 夹式扣; D 形环扣; 双针扣; 双环扣; 框架扣; 马具扣; 可替换扣; 磁力扣; 微调扣; O 形环扣; 板扣; 快拆扣; 可翻转扣; 单针扣; 滑动式/无针扣; 按扣; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta zaponke za pas: Samodejna/zaskočna zaponka; Škatlasta zaponka; Zatezna zaponka; Sponka na klik; Zaponka D-obroček; Zaponka z dvema iglama; Zaponka z dvojnim obročkom; Okvirna zaponka; Zaponka za pasove; Zamenljiva zaponka; Magnetna zaponka; Mikronastavljiva zaponka; Zaponka O-obroček; Ploščata zaponka; Zaponka s hitrim odpenjanjem; Obojestranska zaponka; Zaponka z eno iglo/zatičem; Drsna zaponka / brez igle; Zaskočna zaponka; Drugo
de: Typ der Gürtelschnalle: Automatik-/Ratschenschnalle; Kastenschnalle; Klemmschnalle; Clipschnalle; D-Ring-Schnalle; Doppeldornschnalle; Doppelring-Schnalle; Rahmenschnalle; Harness-Schnalle; Auswechselbare Schnalle; Magnetschnalle; Feinverstellbare Schnalle; O-Ring-Schnalle; Plattenschnalle; Schnellverschluss-Schnalle; Wendeschnalle; Eindornschnalle; Schiebeschnalle / dornlose Schnalle; Steckschnalle; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tipo fivela de cinto: Fivela automática / catraca; Fivela de caixa; Fivela de pressão; Fivela de clipe; Fivela argola em D; Fivela de pino duplo; Fivela de argola dupla; Fivela de armação; Fivela de arreio; Fivela intercambiável; Fivela magnética; Fivela de microajuste; Fivela argola em O; Fivela de placa; Fivela de liberação rápida; Fivela reversível; Fivela de pino simples; Fivela deslizante / sem pino; Fivela de engate; Outros
cs: Typ spony na opasek: Automatická / ráčnová přezka; Desková přezka; Svěrací přezka; Zacvakávací spona; D-kroužek; Přezka se dvěma trny; Přezka se dvěma kroužky; Rámová přezka; Postrojová přezka; Vyměnitelná přezka; Magnetická přezka; Mikronastavitelná přezka; O-kroužek; Placková přezka; Rychloupínací spona; Oboustranná přezka; Přezka s jedním trnem; Posuvná přezka / bez trnu; Zacvakávací přezka; Jiné
ja: ベルトバックルタイプ: オートロック / ラチェットバックル; ボックスバックル; クランプバックル; クリップバックル; Dリングバックル; ダブルピンバックル; ダブルリングバックル; フレームバックル; ハーネスバックル; 付け替え可能バックル; マグネットバックル; マイクロアジャストバックル; Oリングバックル; プレートバックル; クイックリリースバックル; リバーシブルバックル; シングルピンバックル; スライド / ピンなしバックル; スナップバックル; その他